California statutes. Penal Code
If in a civil action or special proceeding a witness be a prisoner, confined in a state prison within this state, an order for the prisoner’s examination in the prison by deposition may be made.

1. By the court itself in which the action or special proceeding is pending, unless it be a small claims court.

2. By a judge of the superior court of the county where the action or proceeding is pending, if pending before a small claims court or before a judge or other person out of court.

Such order can only be made on the motion of a party, upon affidavit showing the nature of the action or proceeding, the testimony expected from the witness, and its materiality. The deposition, when ordered, shall be taken in accordance with Section 2622.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 431.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2624.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a court may, upon the submission of a written request by the party calling the witness, order an incarcerated witness to testify in legal proceedings via two-way electronic audiovisual communication.

(b) As used in this section, “legal proceedings” includes preliminary hearings, civil trials, and criminal trials.

(c) With reference to criminal trials only, the procedure described in this section shall only be used with the consent of both parties expressed in open court, and, in consultation with the defendant’s counsel, upon a waiver by the defendant of his or her right to compel the physical presence of the witness, pursuant to the Sixth Amendment to the United States Constitution and Section 15 of Article I of the California Constitution. This waiver may be rescinded by the defendant upon a showing of good cause.

(d) No inducement shall be offered nor any penalty imposed in connection with a defendant’s consent to allow a witness to testify via closed-circuit television.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2625.

(a) For the purposes of this section only, the term “prisoner” includes any individual in custody in a state prison, the California Rehabilitation Center, or a county jail, or who is a ward confined in a secure youth treatment facility or who, upon a verdict or finding that the individual was insane at the time of committing an offense, or mentally incompetent to be tried or adjudged to punishment, is confined in a state hospital for the care and treatment of persons with mental health disorders or in any other public or private treatment facility.

(b) In a proceeding brought under Part 4 (commencing with Section 7800) of Division 12 of the Family Code, and Section 366.26 of the
 Welfare and Institutions Code, if the proceeding seeks to terminate the parental rights of a prisoner, or a proceeding brought under Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, if the proceeding seeks to adjudicate the child of a prisoner a dependent child of the court, a proceeding brought under Section 388 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, if the prisoner is the petitioner, or a hearing described in Section 361, 366.21, 366.22, or 366.25, when that hearing is related to the child of the prisoner, or any hearing at which parentage of a child of the prisoner is to be determined, the superior court of the county in which the proceeding is pending, or a judge thereof, shall order notice of any court proceeding regarding the proceeding transmitted to the prisoner.

(c) Service of notice shall be made pursuant to Section 7881 or 7882
 of the Family Code or Section 290.2, 291, 293, or 294 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as appropriate.

(d) Upon receipt by the court of a statement from the prisoner or the prisoner’s attorney indicating the prisoner’s desire to be present during the court’s proceedings, the court shall issue an order for the temporary removal of the prisoner from the institution, and for the prisoner’s production before the court. A proceeding shall not be held under Part 4 (commencing with Section 7800) of Division 12 of the Family Code or Section 366.26 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and a petition to adjudge the child of a prisoner a dependent child of the court pursuant to
 Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall not be adjudicated without the physical presence of the prisoner or the prisoner’s attorney, unless the court has before it a knowing waiver of the right of physical presence signed by the prisoner or an affidavit signed by the warden, superintendent, or other person in charge of the institution, or a designated representative stating that the prisoner has, by express statement or action, indicated an intent not to appear at the proceeding.

(e) In any other action or proceeding in which a prisoner’s parental or marital rights are subject to adjudication, an order for the prisoner’s temporary removal from the institution and for the prisoner’s production before the court may be made by the superior court of the county in which the action or proceeding is pending, or
 by a judge thereof. A copy of the order shall be transmitted to the warden, superintendent, or other person in charge of the institution not less than 15 days before the order is to be executed. The order shall be executed by the sheriff of the county in which it shall be made, whose duty it shall be to bring the prisoner before the proper court, to keep the prisoner safely, and when the prisoner’s presence is no longer required, to return the prisoner to the institution from which the prisoner was taken. The expense of executing the order shall be a proper charge against, and shall be paid by, the county in which the order shall be made.

The order shall be to the following effect:

County of ____ (as the case may be).

The people of the State of California to the warden of
 ____:

An order having been made this day by me, that (name of prisoner) be produced in this court as a party in the case of ____, you are commanded to deliver (name of prisoner) into the custody of ____ for the purpose of (recite purposes).

Dated this ____ day of ____, 20__.

(f) When a prisoner is removed from the institution pursuant to this section, the prisoner shall remain in the constructive custody of the warden, superintendent, or other person in charge of the institution.

(g) A prisoner who is a parent of a child involved in a dependency hearing described in this section and who has either waived the right to physical presence at the hearing pursuant to subdivision (d) or who has not
 been ordered before the court
 shall, in order to facilitate the parent’s participation, be given the opportunity to participate in the hearing by videoconference, if that technology is available, and if that participation otherwise complies with the law. If videoconferencing technology is not available, teleconferencing shall be utilized to facilitate parental participation.
 This subdivision does not limit a prisoner’s right to physically attend a dependency hearing as provided in this section. This section does not authorize the use of videoconference or teleconference to replace in-person family visits with prisoners.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature to maintain internal job placement opportunities and preserve earned privileges for prisoners, and prevent the removal of prisoners subject to this section from court-ordered courses as a result of their participation in the proceedings described in this section.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, a court shall not order the removal and production of a prisoner sentenced to death, whether or not that sentence is being appealed, in any action or proceeding in which the prisoner’s
 parental rights are subject to adjudication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 274, Sec. 1.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2626.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is authorized to accept donated materials and services related to videoconferencing and teleconferencing in order to implement a program, at a prison to be determined by the department, to facilitate the participation of incarcerated parents in dependency court hearings regarding their children.

(b) The implementation of this program is contingent upon the receipt of sufficient donations of materials and services by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 482, Sec. 2.   (SB 962)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sexual Abuse in Detention [2635. - 2644.]

2635.

2635.The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall review informational handbooks regarding sexual abuse in detention published by outside organizations. Upon approving the content thereof, handbooks provided by one or more outside organizations shall be made available to inmates and wards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2636.

For the purposes of this section, all references to classification of wards shall take effect upon the adoption of a classification system for wards developed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in compliance with Farrell v. Allen, Alameda County Superior Court Case No. RG 03079344.

The following practices shall be instituted to prevent sexual violence and promote inmate and ward safety in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation:

(a) The
 Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation inmate classification and housing assignment procedures shall take into account risk factors that can lead to inmates and wards becoming the target of sexual victimization or of being sexually aggressive toward others. Relevant considerations include:

(1) Age of the inmate or ward.

(2) Whether the offender is a violent or nonviolent offender.

(3) Whether the inmate or ward has served a prior term of commitment.

(4) Whether the inmate or ward has a history of mental illness.

(b) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall ensure that staff members intervene when an inmate or ward appears to be the target of sexual harassment or
 intimidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2637.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall ensure that its protocols for responding to sexual abuse include all of the following:

(a) The safety of an inmate or ward who alleges that he or she has been the victim of sexual abuse shall be immediately and discreetly ensured. Staff shall provide the safest possible housing options to inmates and wards who have experienced repeated abuse. Housing options may include discreet institution transfers.

(b) Inmates and wards who file complaints of sexual abuse shall not be punished, either directly or indirectly, for doing so. If a person is segregated for his or her own protection, segregation must be nondisciplinary.

(c) Any person who knowingly or willfully submits inaccurate or untruthful information in regards to sexual abuse is punishable pursuant to department regulations.

(d) Under no circumstances is it appropriate to suggest that an inmate should fight to avoid sexual violence or to suggest that the reported sexual abuse is not significant enough to be addressed by staff.

(e) Staff shall not discriminate in their response to inmates and wards who are gay, bisexual, or transgender who experience sexual aggression, or report that they have
 experienced sexual abuse.

(f) Retaliation against an inmate or ward for making an allegation of sexual abuse shall be strictly prohibited.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2638.

Thoughtful, confidential standards of physical and mental health care shall be implemented to reduce the impact of sexual abuse on inmates and wards in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation that include all of the following:

(a) Victims shall receive appropriate acute-trauma care for rape victims, including, but not limited to, treatment of injuries, HIV/AIDS prophylactic measures, and, later, testing for sexually transmittable diseases.

(b) Health practitioners who conduct or encounter an inmate or ward suffering from problems that might indicate sexual abuse, such as trauma, sexually transmissible diseases, pregnancy, or chronic pain symptoms, shall ask whether the patient has experienced sexual abuse.

(c) Practitioners should strive to ask frank, straightforward questions about sexual incidents without shaming inmates or displaying embarrassment about the subject matter.

(d) Confidential mental health counseling intended to help the victim to cope with the aftermath of abuse shall be offered to those who report sexual abuse. Victims shall be monitored for suicidal impulses, posttraumatic stress disorder, depression, and other mental health consequences.

(e) Any adult inmate in mental health counseling for any reason shall be entitled
 to speak confidentially about sexual abuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2639.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall ensure that the following procedures are performed in the investigation and prosecution of sexual abuse incidents:

(a) The provision of safe housing options, medical care, and the like shall not be contingent upon the victim’s willingness to press charges.

(b) Investigations into allegations of sexual abuse shall include, when deemed appropriate by the investigating agency, the use of forensic rape kits, questioning of suspects and witnesses, and gathering of other relevant evidence.

(c) Physical and testimonial evidence shall be carefully preserved for use in any future proceedings.

(d) Staff attitudes that inmates and wards cannot provide reliable information shall be discouraged.

(e) If an investigation confirms that any employee has sexually abused an inmate or ward, that employee shall be terminated. Administrators shall report criminal sexual abuse by staff to law enforcement authorities.

(f) Consensual sodomy and oral copulation among inmates is prohibited by subdivision (e) of Section 286 and subdivision (e) of Section 287 or
 former Section 288a, respectively. Without repealing those provisions, the increased scrutiny provided by this article shall apply only to nonconsensual sexual contact among inmates and custodial sexual misconduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 102.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2640.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall collect data as follows:

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall keep statistics on the sexual abuse of inmates and wards. Sexual abuse incidents shall not be classified as “other” nor simply included in a broader category of general assaults.

(b) Statistics shall include whether the abuse was perpetrated by a staff member or other inmate, the results of the
 investigation and any resolution of the complaint by department officials and prosecution authorities.

The data shall be made available to the Office of the Sexual Abuse in Detention Elimination Ombudsperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2641.

(a) The Office of the Sexual Abuse in Detention Elimination Ombudsperson is hereby created in state government to ensure the impartial resolution of inmate and ward sexual abuse complaints. The office shall be based within the Office of the Inspector General. The duties of this office may be contracted to outside nongovernmental experts.

(b) The ombudsperson shall have the authority to inspect all of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation institutions and to interview all
 inmates and wards.

(c) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall allow all inmates and wards to write confidential letters regarding sexual abuse to the ombudsperson.

(d) Information about how to confidentially contact the ombudsperson shall be clearly posted in all of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation institutions.

(e) The Office of the Inspector General shall investigate reports of the mishandling of incidents of sexual abuse, while maintaining the confidentiality of the victims of sexual abuse, if requested by the victim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2642.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall:

Develop guidelines for allowing outside organizations and service agencies to offer resources to inmates and wards, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Rape crisis agencies.

(2) Hospitals.

(3) Gay rights organizations.

(4) HIV/AIDS service providers.

(5) Civil rights organizations.

(6) Human rights organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2643.

The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2644.

(a) A male correctional officer shall not conduct a pat down search of a female inmate unless the prisoner presents a risk of immediate harm to herself or others or risk of escape and there is not a female correctional officer available to conduct the search.

(b) A male correctional officer shall not enter into an area of the institution where female inmates may be in a state of undress, or be in an area where they can view female inmates in a state of
 undress, including, but not limited to, restrooms, shower areas, or medical treatment areas, unless an inmate in the area presents a risk of immediate harm to herself or others or if there is a medical emergency in the area. A male correctional officer shall not enter into an area prohibited under this subdivision if there is a female correctional officer who can resolve the situation in a safe and timely manner without his assistance. To prevent incidental viewing, staff of the opposite sex shall announce their presence when entering a housing unit.

(c) If a male correctional officer conducts a pat down search under an exception provided in subdivision (a) or enters a prohibited area under an exception provided in subdivision (b), the circumstances for and details of the exception shall be documented within three days of
 the incident. The documentation shall be reviewed by the warden and retained by the institution for reporting purposes.

(d) The department may promulgate regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 174, Sec. 1.   (AB 2550)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Treatment of Prisoners [2650. - 2695.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Mistreatment of Prisoners [2650. - 2657.]

2650.

The person of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment in the state prison or to imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 is under the protection of the law, and any injury to his person, not authorized by law, is punishable in the same manner as if he were not convicted or
 sentenced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 463.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

2651.

No punishment, except as may be authorized by the Director of Corrections, shall be inflicted and then only by the order and under the direction of the wardens. Nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation or impairment of the authority of the Board of Prison Terms in exercising its functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

2652.

It shall be unlawful to use in the prisons, any cruel, corporal or unusual punishment or to inflict any treatment or allow any lack of care whatever which would injure or impair the health of the prisoner, inmate or person confined; and punishment by the use of the strait-jacket, gag, thumb-screw, shower-bath or the tricing up of prisoners, inmates or persons confined is hereby prohibited. Any person who violates the provisions of this section or who aids, abets, or attempts in any way to contribute to the violation of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2652.5.

No person employed by the Department of Corrections, the Department of the Youth Authority, or any city or county jail facility shall place any chain or other mechanical restraint around the neck of any prisoner for any purpose. Any violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1047.)
-------------------------------------------

2653.

(a) If a physician employed by the Department of Corrections or the Department of the Youth Authority certifies in writing that a particular medical treatment is required to prevent a violation of Section 147, 673, 2650, or 2652, or is required to prevent serious and imminent harm to the health of a prisoner, the order for that particular medical treatment may not be modified or canceled by any employee of the department without the approval of the chief medical officer of the institution or the physician in attendance unless an inmate or ward
 has a known history of violent or otherwise disruptive behavior that requires additional measures to protect the safety and security of the institution specified in writing by the warden or superintendent, or unless immediate security needs require alternate or modified procedures. Following any necessary modified or alternate security procedures, treatment of the inmate or ward shall be effected as expeditiously as possible.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a registered nurse from questioning, or seeking clarification of, an order from a physician that in the professional judgment of that nurse endangers patient health or safety, or otherwise is contrary to the professional ethics of the registered nurse.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall be subject to appropriate disciplinary action by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 602, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2656.

(a) A person sentenced to incarceration or who is being held pursuant to a pending criminal matter in a county or city jail, or other county or city custodial correctional facility shall not be deprived of the possession or use of any orthopedic or prosthetic appliance, if such appliance has been prescribed or recommended and fitted by a physician.

(b) If, however, the person in charge of the county or city custodial or correctional facility has probable cause to believe possession of such orthopedic or prosthetic appliance constitutes an immediate risk of bodily harm to any person in the
 facility or threatens the security of the facility, such appliance may be removed.

If such appliance is removed, the prisoner shall be deprived of such appliance only during such time as the facts which constitute probable cause for its removal continue to exist; if such facts cease to exist, then the person in charge of the facility shall return such appliance to the prisoner.

When such appliance is removed, the prisoner shall be examined by a physician within 24 hours after such removal.

If the examining physician determines that removal is or will be injurious to the health or safety of the prisoner, he shall so inform the prisoner and the person in charge of the facility. Upon receipt of the physician’s opinion, the person in charge of the facility shall either return the appliance to the prisoner or refuse to return such appliance to the prisoner, informing the physician and
 the prisoner of the reasons for such refusal and promptly providing the prisoner with a form, as specified in subdivision (c) of this section, by which the prisoner may petition the superior court of the county in which the facility is located for return of the appliance.

Upon petition by the prisoner, the court shall either order the appliance returned to the petitioner or within two judicial days after the petition is filed receive evidence relevant to the granting or denial of the petition. When evidence is received, the court shall consider the opinion of the physician who examined the prisoner and the opinion of the person in charge of the facility and all other evidence it deems relevant. A decision shall be promptly made and shall be based upon a weighing of the risk of immediate harm to persons within the facility and the threat to the security of the facility created by the appliance’s presence in the facility as against the risk to the health and safety of
 the petitioner by its removal.

(c) The form for a request for return of an orthopedic or prosthetic appliance as required in subdivision (b) of this section shall be substantially as follows: 

(Name of the facility) ____ day of ____ 19__

I, ____ (person in charge of the facility), have today received a request for the return of an orthopedic or prosthetic appliance, namely, ____ (description of appliance or device) from the undersigned prisoner. Signature or mark of prisoner
making request for return of
appliance or deviceWhen the prisoner has signed or made his mark upon such form, the person in charge of the facility shall promptly file the completed form with the superior court.

(d) No person incarcerated in any facility of the Department of Corrections shall be deprived of the use or possession of any orthopedic or prosthetic appliance unless both the inmate’s personal physician and a department physician concur in the professional opinion that such appliance is no longer needed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

2657.

(a) No person confined in a state prison, as defined in Section 4504, shall be subject to any institutional disciplinary action subsequent to an acquittal in a court of law upon criminal charges brought and tried for the act or omission which is the sole basis of the institutional disciplinary action.

(b) Where the act or omission resulting in acquittal is in any way referred to in any Department of Corrections file pertaining to the prisoner, the fact of acquittal by a court of law shall be clearly inscribed near each such reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 726.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Organic Therapy [2670. - 2680.]

2670.

It is hereby recognized and declared that all persons, including all persons involuntarily confined, have a fundamental right against enforced interference with their thought processes, states of mind, and patterns of mentation through the use of organic therapies; that this fundamental right requires that no person with the capacity for informed consent who refuses organic therapy shall be compelled to undergo such therapy; and that in order to justify the use of organic therapy upon a person who lacks the capacity for informed consent, other than psychosurgery as referred to in subdivision (c) of Section 2670.5 which is not to be administered to such persons, the state shall establish that the organic therapy would be beneficial to the person, that there is a compelling interest in administering such therapy, and that there are no less onerous alternatives to such therapy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

2670.5.

(a) No person confined or detained under Title 1 (commencing with Section 2000) and Title 2 (commencing with Section 3200) shall be administered or subjected to any organic therapy as defined in subdivision (c) without his or her informed consent, provided that:

(1) If the person gives his or her informed consent to organic therapy, it shall be administered only if there has been compliance with Sections 2675 to 2680, inclusive.

(2) If the person lacks the capacity for informed consent to organic therapy other than psychosurgery as referred to in subdivision (c), in order to proceed with the therapy, the warden shall secure an order from the superior court to authorize the administration of the therapy in accordance with Sections 2675 to 2680, inclusive.

(b) No person confined or detained under Title 1 (commencing with Section 2000) or Title 2 (commencing with Section 3200) who lacks the capacity for informed consent shall be administered or subjected to psychosurgery as referred to in subdivision (c).

(c) The term organic therapy refers to:

(1) Psychosurgery, including lobotomy, stereotactic surgery, electronic, chemical or other destruction of brain tissues, or implantation of electrodes into brain tissue.

(2) Shock therapy, including, but not limited to, any convulsive therapy and insulin shock treatments.

(3) The use of any drugs, electric shocks, electronic stimulation of the brain, or infliction of physical pain when used as an aversive or reinforcing stimulus in a program of aversive, classical, or operant conditioning.

(d) A person does not waive his or her right to refuse any organic therapy by having previously given his or her informed consent to the therapy, and the person may withdraw his or her consent at any time.

If required by sound medical-psychiatric practice, the attending physician shall, after the person withdraws his or her previously given informed consent, gradually phase the person out of the therapy if sudden cessation would create a serious risk of mental or physical harm to the person.

(e) Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the attending physician from administering nonorganic therapies such as psychotherapy, psychoanalysis, group therapy, milieu therapy, or other therapies or programs involving communication or interaction among physicians, patients, and others, with or without the use of drugs when used for purposes other than described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(f) Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the administration of drugs not connected with a program of conditioning and intended to cause negative physical reactions to ingestion of alcohol or drugs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1420, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

2671.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2670.5, if a confined person has inflicted or attempted to inflict substantial physical harm upon the person of another or himself, or presents, as a result of mental disorder, an imminent threat of substantial harm to others or himself, the attending physician may in such emergency employ or authorize for no longer than seven days in any three-month period the immediate use of shock treatments in order to alleviate such danger.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 2670.5, if a confined person gives his informed consent to a program of shock therapy for a period not to exceed three months, the attending physician may administer such therapy for a period not to exceed three months in any one-year period without prior judicial authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

2672.

(a) For purposes of this article, “informed consent” means that a person must knowingly and intelligently, without duress or coercion, and clearly and explicitly manifest his consent to the proposed organic therapy to the attending physician.

(b) A person confined shall not be deemed incapable of informed consent solely by virtue of being diagnosed with a mental health disorder.

(c) A person confined shall be deemed incapable of informed consent if the person cannot understand, or knowingly and intelligently act upon, the information specified in Section 2673.

(d) A person confined shall be deemed
 incapable of informed consent if, for any reason, he or she cannot manifest his or her consent to the attending physician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 47.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2673.

(a) For purposes of this article, “informed consent” requires that the attending physician directly communicate with the person and clearly and explicitly provide all the following information prior to the person’s decision:

(1) The nature and seriousness of the person’s illness, disorder or defect.

(2) The nature of the proposed organic therapy and its intended duration.

(3) The likelihood of improvement or deterioration, temporary or permanent, without the administration of the proposed organic therapy.

(4) The likelihood and degree of improvement, remission, control, or cure resulting from the administration of such organic therapy, and the likelihood, nature, and extent of changes in and intrusions upon the person’s personality and patterns of behavior and thought or mentation and the degree to which these changes may be irreversible. This information shall indicate the probable duration and intensity of such therapy and whether such therapy may have to be continued indefinitely for optimum therapeutic benefit.

(5) The likelihood, nature, extent, and duration of side effects of the proposed organic therapy, and how and to what extent they may be controlled, if at all.

(6) The uncertainty of the benefits and hazards of the proposed organic therapy because of the lack of sufficient data available to the medical profession, or any other reason for such uncertainty.

(7) The reasonable alternative organic therapy or psychotherapeutic modality of therapy, or nonorganic behavior modification programs, and why the organic therapy recommended is the therapy of choice. These alternatives shall be described and explained to the person in the manner specified in this section.

(8) Whether the proposed therapy is generally regarded as sound by the medical profession, or is considered experimental.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

2674.

A written manifestation of informed consent shall be obtained in all cases by the attending physician and shall be preserved and available to the person, his attorney, his guardian, or his conservator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

2675.

(a) If the proposed organic therapy is not prohibited by subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 2670.5, then in order to administer the therapy the warden of the institution in which the person is confined shall petition the superior court of the county in which the person is confined for an order authorizing such organic therapy.

(b) The petition shall summarize the facts which the attending physician is required to communicate to the person pursuant to Section 2673, and shall state whether the person has the capacity for informed consent, and, if so, whether the person has given his or her informed consent to the proposed therapy. The petition shall clearly specify what organic therapy the institution proposes to administer to the person. The petition shall specify what mental illness, disorder, abnormality, or defect justifies the administration of such therapy. Copies of the petition shall be personally served upon the person and served upon his or her attorney, guardian or conservator on the same day as it is filed with the clerk of the superior court.

(c) The person confined, or his or her attorney, guardian, or conservator may file a response to the petition for organic therapy. The response shall be filed no later than 10 days after service of the petition unless the court grants a continuance not to exceed 10 additional days, and shall be served on the warden on the same day it is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1420, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

2676.

(a) Any person, or his or her attorney, guardian, or conservator may file a petition with the superior court of the county in which he or she is confined for an order to prohibit the administration upon him or her of an organic therapy. The filing of such a petition shall constitute a refusal of consent or withdrawal of any prior consent to an organic therapy. The clerk of the court shall serve a copy of the petition, on the same day it is filed, upon the warden.

(b) The warden shall file a response to the petition to prohibit the enforced administration of any organic therapy. The response shall be filed no later than 10 days after the filing of the petition, unless the court grants a continuance not to exceed 10 additional days, and shall be personally served upon the person and served upon his or her attorney, guardian, or conservator on the same day as it is filed with the clerk of the superior court. The response shall not constitute a petition for an order to proceed with any organic therapy pursuant to Section 2675, which shall be the exclusive procedure for authorization to administer any organic therapy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1420, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2677.

At the time of filing of a petition pursuant to Section 2676 by the person, or pursuant to Section 2675 by the warden, the court shall appoint the public defender or other attorney to represent the person unless the person is financially able to provide his or her own attorney. The attorney shall advise the person of his or her rights in relation to the proceeding in question and shall represent him or her before the court.

The court shall also appoint an independent medical expert on the person’s behalf to examine the person’s medical, mental, or emotional condition and to testify thereon, unless the person is financially able to obtain the expert testimony. However, if the person has given his or her informed consent to the proposed organic therapy, other than psychosurgery as referred to in subdivision (c) of Section 2670.5, and his or her attorney concurs in the proposed administration of the organic therapy, the court may waive the requirement that an independent medical expert be appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2678.

The court shall conduct the proceedings within 10 judicial days from the filing of the petition described in Section 2675 or 2676, whichever is filed earlier, unless the warden’s attorney or the person’s attorney requests a continuance, which may be for a maximum of 10 additional judicial days. The court shall conduct the proceedings in accordance with constitutional guarantees of due process of law and the procedures under Section 13 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1420, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

2679.

(a) The court shall determine whether the state has proven, by clear and convincing evidence, that the confined person has the capacity for informed consent and has manifested his informed consent.
